Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2623XS (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 410 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 279.2A Public comment ââ regular 1 meetings and special meetings. 2 1. The board of directors of each school district shall do 3 all of the following: 4 a. Provide a reasonable amount of time during each regular 5 meeting and special meeting to receive public comment. 6 b. Allow each interested member of the public to speak 7 during the public comment period; provided, however, that the 8 board of directors may impose a time limit on the amount of 9 time a member of the public is allowed to speak if the time 10 limit is the same for each speaker and necessary due to the 11 amount of members of the public wishing to speak. 12 2. The board of directors of a school district shall not 13 require a member of the public to be placed on the regular 14 meetingâs or special meetingâs agenda prior to the meeting in 15 order for the member of the public to speak during the public 16 comment period. 17